hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Računalni monitori: Prijenosni monitori
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Écrans d’ordinateur: Moniteurs portables
sv: Elektronik > Video > Datorskärmar: Bärbara skärmar
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Οθόνες υπολογιστών: Φορητές οθόνες
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Datamonitorer: Bærbare skjermer
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Kompiuterių monitoriai: Nešiojami monitoriai
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 电脑显示器: 便携式显示器
en: Electronics > Video > Computer Monitors: Portable Monitors
nl: Elektronica > Video > Computerbeeldschermen: Draagbare monitoren
es: Electrónica > Video > Monitores de computadora: Monitores portátiles
cs: Elektronika > Video > Počítačové monitory: Přenosné monitory
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > จอคอมพิวเตอร์: จอมอนิเตอร์พกพา
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Monitoare pentru calculatoare: Monitoare portabile
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Tietokonemonitorit: Kannettava näyttö
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > PCモニター: ポータブルモニター
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Màn hình máy tính: Màn hình di động
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 컴퓨터 모니터: 휴대용 모니터
tr: Elektronik > Video > Bilgisayar Monitörleri: Taşınabilir Monitörler
hu: Elektronika > Videó > Számítógép-monitorok: Hordozható monitorok
de: Elektronik > Video > Computermonitore: Tragbare Monitore
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Monitores de computador: Monitores portáteis
pl: Elektronika > Video > Monitory komputerowe: Monitory przenośne
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Počítačové monitory: Prenosné monitory
it: Elettronica > Video > Monitor per computer: Monitor portatili
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Monitores de computador: Monitores portáteis
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Компьютерные мониторы: Портативные мониторы
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Компютърни монитори: Преносими монитори
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Računalniški zasloni: Prenosni monitorji
da: Elektronik > Video > Computerskærme: Bærbare skærme
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 電腦螢幕: 攜帶式顯示器